Louisiana, session 2026, SB95.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:183.4(B), and 3983(A)(2)(a)(i) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 17:183.4(B)(4), 3983(A)(2)(a)(v) and 3991.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§183.4. Vocational and technical education; partnering with other schools to provide
courses
* * *
B.(1) If a high school does not offer vocational and technical education
courses, the governing authority of the school may enter into agreements to partner
Page 1 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-70 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 95
with any of the following:
(a) other Other public schools, including those public charter schools
authorized pursuant to R.S. 17:3983. or with
(b) one One or more two-year public postsecondary education institutions in
the state. or with
(c) nonprofit Nonprofit proprietary schools.
(d) or Course Choice providers approved by the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education.
(2) The purpose of the partnering agreement provided in Paragraph (1)
of this Subsection shall be to provide available vocational and technical education
courses for the student as required in Subsection A of this Section. Nothing in this
Section shall be interpreted to supersede R.S. 17:4002.1 et seq.
(2)(3) If the high school's approved mission or curriculum model does not
align with providing vocational and technical education courses, the governing
authority of the school may request a waiver from the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education of the requirements of Subsection A of this Section.
(3)(4) No student shall be assessed a course fee when the local education
agency receives career development funds in the minimum foundation program for
such course.
* * *
§3983. Chartering process by type; eligibility; limitations; faculty approval; parental
approval
A. (1) * * *
(2)(a)(i) Each proposal for a Type 1 or Type 3 charter school shall first be
made to the local school board with jurisdiction where the school is to be located,
except as provided for in Item (ii), (iii), or (iv), or (v) of this Subparagraph, by
submitting a written proposal. The applicant shall also provide notice of application
submission for a Type 1 or Type 3 charter school to the state Department of
Education. If, after review as required by R.S. 17:3982, the local school board denies
Page 2 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-70 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 95
the proposal, or if conditions placed on the proposal by the local school board as
provided in Paragraph (B)(2) of this Section are not acceptable to the chartering
group, then a proposal for a Type 2 charter school may be made to the state board.
* * *
(v) Pursuant to R.S. 17:3991.2, an initial proposal for a vocational and
technical education charter school may be made to the state board as a proposal
for a Type 2 charter school, so long as the initial proposal is accompanied by a
resolution of support adopted by the Louisiana Board of Commerce and
Industry and that meets the requirements of R.S. 17:3991.2.
* * *
§3991.2. Vocational and technical education charter schools; location of
schools; economic sectors; parental choice; required actions
A.(1) Notwithstanding geographic or other requirements for enrollment
contained in this Chapter, a charter agreement may provide, initially or by
amendment, for the enrollment of students, by parents, that are seeking
vocational and technical education for their children. Preference may be given
to students whose parent or legal guardian is employed or resides within the
economic sector that is designated by the State Board of Commerce and
Industry, as provided in R.S. 51:934.
(2) In addition to the applicable requirements in R.S. 17:3991, the
application must be accompanied by a resolution from the State Board of
Commerce, as provided in R.S. 51:934.
B.(1) The charter agreement shall also specify all of the following:
(a) The school's maximum enrollment.
(b) The maximum number of students that may be enrolled into each
specialty vocational and technical education class or program.
(c) Which classes or programs are aligned with high-demand and high-
wage jobs, or determined as STAR jobs by Louisiana Works.
(2)(a) A charter agreement may provide, initially or by amendment, for
Page 3 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-70 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 95
board seats on its charter governing or management board to be held by various
industry representatives who are employed by or retired from a business
located within the economic sector or have served as an officer or director on
the board of such business. Such membership is subject to all other provisions
of law except those that are contrary to provisions in this Chapter.
(b) For purposes of this Section, an industry representative may not be
an officer, board member, or employee of any legal entity except for a
corporation identified in R.S. 18:1505.2(L)(3).
C. Any business entity or corporation that is identified in R.S.
18:1505.2(L)(3), whether the gaming entity is for profit or not for profit and
whether acting individually or as part of a consortium of such corporations,
may not donate or provide any of the following to the school:
(1) The land on which the school is built.
(2) The school building or the space the school occupies.
(3) Major renovations to the existing school building or other
improvements including major investments in technology. For purposes of this
Paragraph, a major renovation to the existing school building means changes
that provide significant opportunities for substantial improvement including
but not limited to a structural change to the foundation, roof, floor, interior or
exterior walls or extension of an existing facility to increase its floor area; or an
extensive alteration of an existing facility, such as a change in its function or
purpose, even if such renovation does not include any structural change to the
facility.
(4) A major investment in technology, including but is not limited to a
donation of hardware, software, internet access, internet hardware, enterprise
systems, software licenses, smart board technology, or audiovisual equipment.
D. As used in Subsection C of this Section, the value of a major
renovation or of an investment of technology shall be equal to at least fifty
percent of the per pupil allocation of state funds by the minimum foundation
Page 4 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-70 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 95
program formula for that year for the parish in which the school is located
multiplied by the school's enrollment as defined in the charter agreement.
E. For the duration of the enrollment preference specified in Paragraph
(A)(1) of this Section, businesses located within the economic sector may enter
into memorandums of understanding with the charter school and shall specify
the methods by which the businesses may support the charter school, including
but not limited to internships for students, career counseling, academic
tutoring, or enrichment activities.
F.(1) An enrollment preference pursuant to Paragraph (A)(1) of this
Section shall not be implemented in a way that displaces children enrolled at the
school at the time the charter agreement or amendment providing for the
preference is authorized.
(2) Enrollment at the school shall otherwise be as provided by this
Chapter.
G. As used in this Section, "STAR Jobs" or "Strategic Targeted Area
Resource jobs" means those employment opportunities identified by the
Louisiana Works Commission that have high-demand, high-wage jobs and are
listed on the commission's website on the date of the application.
Section 2. R.S. 51:934 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§934. Resolutions of support for vocational and technical education
charter schools; economic sectors
A. The legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Economic development and the economic vitality of the state are
dependent upon an educated and highly trained workforce.
(2) Manufacturing, industrial, technology, energy, utility, and other
sectors are all dependent on a workforce that has vocational training and
technical education.
(3) High-quality educational options that include vocational and
technical educations are essential to the academic growth of Louisiana's
Page 5 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-70 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 95
students and the ability of the state to attract businesses, maintain a highly
talented workforce, and expand existing businesses.
B. A majority of the members of the State Board of Commerce and
Industry may adopt a resolution in support of an application for a vocational
and technical education charter school, pursuant to R.S. 17:934. If the State
Board of Commerce adopts a resolution, the resolution shall include all of the
following:
(1) An economic sector where jobs require vocational and technical
education training classes and employment skills associated therewith.
(2) A list of the types of vocational and technical education training
classes or skills that are needed for employment in the economic sector.
C. Unless otherwise indicated, the following definitions shall apply to this
Section:
(1) "Economic sector" means the economic development district or the
parishes or geographic area surrounding a location where manufacturing,
industrial, technology, energy, utility, and other sector facilities are, or will be,
located that require vocational and technical education to support employment
at the facilities. However an economic sector may not be established to provide
training for a corporation identified in R.S. 18:1505.2(L)(3).
(2) "Vocational and technical education charter schools" means those
Charter schools governed by R.S. 17:3991.2.